New York, session 2025-2026, S4043.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the town of Bedford, county of Westchester, is hereby 3 authorized to accept from the Bedford Hills Fire District, an applica- 4 tion for exemption from school taxes and real property taxes pursuant to 5 section 464 of the real property tax law with respect to the 2022-2023 6 assessment roll, for the parcels owned by such organization, with such 7 parcels being located at 352 Bedford Road, in the town of Bedford, coun- 8 ty of Westchester, otherwise known as Westchester county tax map, 9 section 60.14, block 5, lot 83. 10 If accepted, the application shall be reviewed as if it had been 11 received on or before the taxable status date established for such roll. 12 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to such 13 exemption if such organization had filed an application for exemption by 14 the appropriate taxable status date, the assessor, upon approval by the 15 town of Bedford governing board, may grant exemption from all taxation 16 and make appropriate corrections to the subject roll. If such exemption 17 is granted and such organization therefore shall have paid any tax with 18 respect to the subject roll, the applicable governing body or tax 19 department may, in its sole discretion, provide for the refund of the 20 taxes paid, along with any fines or penalties paid, and cancel any 21 taxes, fines, penalties, interest, or tax liens remaining unpaid. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00037-01-5